Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Chapter 21
IDAHO CREDIT UNION ACT

Sec.

§ 26-2101. Scope.

This chapter shall be known as the “Idaho Credit Union Act” and shall be applicable to all persons except federal credit unions, operating as credit unions in the state of Idaho and to such other persons as shall subject themselves to its provisions, and to such persons who shall by violating any of its provisions become subject to the penalties provided herein.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2101, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2102. Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to allow groups of persons with a common bond as provided in this chapter to form private nonprofit cooperative corporations to be known as credit unions, to provide an opportunity for its members to use and control their own money in order to improve their economic and social condition, to promote thrift at a reasonable rate of return and provide a source of credit at fair and reasonable rates of interest to those persons included in the common bond.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2102, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2103. Supplementary general principles of law applicable.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this chapter, the Uniform Commercial Code, the Uniform Consumer Credit Code, the Idaho Securities Act, the corporation laws of this state and the principles of law and equity, including the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, or other validating or invalidating cause supplement its provisions.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2103, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2104. Definition and use of terms.

As used in this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

“Credit union” means a cooperative nonprofit corporation chartered under the provisions of this chapter.

“Capital” means the shares of a credit union.

“Director” means the director of the department of finance of the state of Idaho.

“Federal supervisory agency” means the National Credit Union Administration.

“Credit union services” means services such as draft and deposit sorting and posting, computation and posting of interest and other credits and charges, preparation and mailing of drafts, statements, notices, and similar items, or any other clerical, bookkeeping, accounting, statistical, or similar functions performed for a credit union.

“Credit union service corporation” means a corporation organized to perform credit union services for two (2) or more credit unions, each of which owns part of the capital stock of such corporations, and which are subject to examination by either the department of finance of the state of Idaho or a federal supervisory agency.

“Interstate credit union” means a credit union chartered under the provisions of this chapter or under the authority of the laws of another state and operating both in Idaho and in one (1) or more other states.

“Invest” means any advance of funds to a credit union service corporation, whether by the purchase of stock, the making of a loan, or otherwise, except a payment for rent earned, goods sold and delivered, or services rendered prior to the making of such payment.

“Surplus funds” means those funds which are not needed to meet a credit union’s members’ loan needs and credit union expenses.

“Nonmembers’ certificates of indebtedness” means all funds received from individuals who are not members of the credit union must be called certificates of indebtedness and are to be shown on the books and records of the credit union as a separate and distinct category. The guaranteed rates of interest upon such certificates of indebtedness will be established by the board of directors.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2104, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582; am. 1997, ch. 111, § 1, p. 269.

§ 26-2105. Organization.

Any seven (7) or more residents of the jurisdiction of the state of Idaho, of legal age, who have a common bond referred to in section 26-2110, Idaho Code, may organize a credit union and become charter members thereof by:

Filing an application furnished by the director.

Executing in triplicate, articles of incorporation by the terms of which they agree to be bound, which articles shall state:

The name, which shall include the words “credit union” and which must clearly indicate the common bond from which members will be taken and which is not the same name as that of any other existing credit union. A credit union may, however, do business in a name which includes only the initials of its name as it appears in its articles of incorporation and the words “credit union,” and the city wherein the proposed credit union is to have its principal place of business;

The term of existence of the credit union, which shall be perpetual;

The par value of shares of the credit union, which shall be at least five dollars ($5.00); and

The names and addresses of the subscribers to the articles of incorporation, and the number of shares subscribed by each.

Adopting bylaws for the general government of the credit union, consistent with the provisions of this chapter and executing the same in triplicate.

Forwarding the required application fee, articles of incorporation and the bylaws to the director. If they conform to the statute, he shall endorse the articles of incorporation and return two (2) copies of the endorsed articles of incorporation and two (2) copies of the bylaws to the applicants of the credit union, one (1) copy of which is to be for the credit union’s permanent files and the other copy to be filed with the county recorder’s office in the county in which the principal place of business is located and with the department of finance. The original copy of the articles of incorporation and bylaws shall be retained by the department of finance. If the director approves or endorses the articles of incorporation, he will issue three (3) charters in original. The director shall have the authority to investigate the application for charter to determine whether the proposed credit union does meet the objectives of this chapter. The determination for the approval of the application for charter shall be under such rules and regulations as shall be adopted by the director. These rules and regulations shall give account to the number of potential members, their stability of employment or membership in the group comprising the common bond of membership and the economic characteristics of the proposed common bond. If, in the opinion of the director, the proposed credit union does not meet these objectives, the charter application shall be denied.

The subscribers for a credit union charter shall not transact any business until formal approval of the charter has been received. In order to simplify the organization of credit unions, the director shall cause to be prepared a form of articles of incorporation and a form of bylaws, consistent with this chapter, which shall be used by credit union incorporators for their guidance.

The articles of incorporation filed in the department of finance shall be available for inspection and a copy may be provided upon payment of an appropriate fee.

History.
I.C.,§ 26-2105, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2106. Amendment to articles of incorporation and bylaws — Approval of director — Procedure.

A credit union’s articles of incorporation and bylaws may be amended as provided in the articles of incorporation and bylaws with approval of the director. Amendments to the articles of incorporation or bylaws must be submitted to the director for approval before they are submitted to a vote by the members of the board. Amendments are deemed to be approved by the director if the director does not deny them within thirty (30) days following receipt of the proposed amendments. Amendments to a credit union’s articles of incorporation and bylaws must conform with section 26-2105, Idaho Code.

Upon approval by the director and the members of the board, as required, the credit union shall promptly deliver amendments to the articles of incorporation, including any necessary filing fees, to the secretary of state for filing. Amendments to the articles of incorporation or bylaws are effective upon written certification of board approval to the director.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2106, as added by 2020, ch. 230, § 2, p. 671.

§ 26-2107. Restrictions.

Any person, corporation, copartnership or association, except a credit union organized under the provisions of this chapter, an interstate credit union with a permit issued under section 26-2152, Idaho Code, the federal credit union act, 48 Statute 1216 (1934), 73 Statute (1959), 12 U.S.C. 192, or the Idaho credit union league, a recognized chapter of the Idaho credit union league, using a name or title containing the words “credit union” or any derivation thereof or representing themselves in their advertising or otherwise conducting business as a credit union shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned not more than one (1) year, or both, and may be permanently enjoined from using such words in its name.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2107, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582; am. 1997, ch. 111, § 2, p. 269.

§ 26-2108. Corporate powers.

A credit union shall have power to:

Make contracts.

Sue and be sued in the name of the credit union.

Adopt and use a common seal and alter same at pleasure.

Own, hold or use any real property or any interest therein as provided in section 26-2109, Idaho Code.

May require the payment of an entrance or membership fee, not to exceed one dollar ($1.00), of any applicant admitted to membership.

Receive from its members payments on shares and deposits, including the right to conduct Christmas share clubs, vacation clubs, and other such thrift organizations within the membership.

Lend its funds to its members as hereinafter provided.

Purchase insurance on the lives of its members in an amount equal to their respective share and loan balances.

Borrow from any financial institution or individuals in an aggregate amount not to exceed fifty per cent (50%) of its members’ shares and deposits.

May invest any surplus funds in such investments as provided for in this chapter.

Make deposits in federally insured banks and savings and loan companies in Idaho, in state or federally chartered credit unions in Idaho and in the Idaho Corporate Credit Union.

Hold membership in other state or federally chartered credit unions in Idaho, in the Idaho Credit Union League, in the Idaho Corporate Credit Union and in other organizations composed of credit unions approved by the director.

Declare dividends on members’ shares and fix the rates on interest paid on members’ certificates of deposit, nonmembers’ certificates of indebtedness, and other thrift accounts as provided for in this chapter.

Fine members for failure to meet punctually obligations to such credit union.

In the event of default, impress a lien upon the shares and deposits and accumulation of dividends and interest of any member to the extent of any loans made to him directly or indirectly, or on which he is surety and for any dues or charges or fines payable by him; the credit union shall also have the right of setoff with respect to every such account.

Relocate its head office or branches and the location of its books and records upon written notice to the director.

Collect, receive and disburse monies in connection with sales of travelers’ checks, money orders and for such other purposes as may provide convenience or benefit for its members.

Exercise such incidental powers as are necessary to carry on the business for which it is incorporated not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

Form and operate a credit union service corporation as provided in section 26-2147, Idaho Code.

Provide for its members, share and deposit accounts from which the member may withdraw funds by the use of a negotiable instrument.

Participate in systems which allow the transfer of credit union funds or the shares or deposits of members by electronic means and hold membership in automated clearing house associations or corporations.
(v) Sell all or part of its assets to another credit union, to purchase all or part of the assets of another credit union and to assume the liabilities of the selling credit union and those of its members subject to the approval of the director.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2108, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582; am. 1982, ch. 210, § 1, p. 583; am. 1987, ch. 80, § 1, p. 80.

§ 26-2109. Power to acquire and hold real property.

A credit union may invest in fixed assets necessary or related to its operations, subject to the following limitations:

The credit union’s net worth equals at least seven percent (7%) of total assets;

The board approves any investment in real property; and

The aggregate book value of all such investments does not exceed seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of the total of its assets.

The director may, upon written application, waive any of the limitations listed in subsection (1) of this section.

A credit union may acquire property through foreclosure, deed in lieu of foreclosure, repossession, or other means in connection with protection or enforcement of the credit union’s rights as a secured lender. Property acquired in this manner shall not be subject to the limitations of subsection (1) of this section.

For purposes of this section:

“Abandoned premises” means premises previously used to transact credit union business but no longer used for that purpose. It also means premises originally acquired to transact future credit union business but no longer intended for that purpose.

“Fixed assets” means premises and furniture, fixtures, and equipment.

“Immediate family member” means a spouse, domestic partner, or other family member living in the same household.

“Partially occupy” means occupation and use, on a full-time basis, of at least fifty percent (50%)of each of the premises by the credit union.

“Premises” means any office, branch office, suboffice, service center, parking lot, other facility, or real estate where the credit union transacts or will transact business.

“Senior management employee” means the credit union’s chief executive officer, any assistant chief executive officers, and the chief financial officer.

“Unimproved land” or “unimproved real property” means:

Raw land or land without development, significant buildings, structures, or site preparation;

Land that has never had improvements;

Land that was improved at one time but has functionally reverted to its unimproved state; or

Land that has been improved, but the improvements serve no purpose for the credit union’s planned use of the property.

Premises not currently used to transact credit union business.

If a credit union acquires premises, including unimproved land or unimproved real property, it must partially occupy each of them within a reasonable period, but no later than six (6) years after the date of acquisition. The director may waive the partial occupation requirements based on economic or business conditions, or other conditions affecting use of the property, subject to a reasonable plan for partial occupancy. To seek a waiver, a credit union must submit a written request to the director and fully explain why it needs the waiver. The director shall provide the credit union a written response, either approving or disapproving the request. The director’s decision shall be based on safety and soundness considerations.
(b) A credit union must make diligent efforts to dispose of abandoned premises and property acquired as described in subsection (3) of this section. The credit union must seek fair market value for the premises or property and record its efforts to dispose of the premises or property. The credit union must complete the sale within five (5) years of abandonment of the premises or acquisition of the property. Upon application by the credit union, the director shall approve the continued holding by the credit union for an additional period of five (5) years upon the credit union’s showing of its good faith attempt to dispose of the premises or property, or that disposal within the first five (5) year period would be detrimental to the credit union. The director shall provide the credit union a written response, either approving or disapproving the application. If the director fails to respond within forty-five (45) days of receipt, the application is deemed approved. The director’s decision shall be based on safety and soundness considerations. The credit union shall, during the second five (5) year period, at the end of each year beginning at the end of the sixth year in which it holds the premises or property, write down the value of the premises or property by twenty percent (20%) of the value carried on its books at the beginning of the second five (5) year period. Value at the beginning of the second five (5) year period shall be the lower of cost or market value as determined pursuant to appraisal.

A credit union must not acquire, except as allowed in subsection (3) of this section for real property, or lease for one (1) year or longer, premises from any of the following, unless the director waives this prohibition:

A member of the credit union’s board of directors, credit committee, supervisory committee, or senior management, or an immediate family member of such individual;

A corporation in which a member of the credit union’s board of directors, credit committee, supervisory committee, or senior management, or an immediate family member of such individual, is an officer or director or has a stock interest of ten percent (10%) or more; or

A partnership, limited liability company, or other entity in which a member of the credit union’s board of directors, credit committee, supervisory committee, or senior management, or an immediate family member of such individual, is a general partner or a limited partner or entity member with an interest of ten percent (10%) or more.

A credit union must not lease for one (1) year or longer premises from any of its employees if the employee is directly involved in acquiring premises, unless the credit union’s board of directors determines the employee’s involvement is not a conflict of interest.

All transactions with business associates or family members not specifically prohibited by this section must be conducted at arm’s length and in the interest of the credit union.

To seek a waiver of any of the prohibitions in subsections (6) through (8) of this section, a credit union must submit a written request to the director and fully explain why it needs the waiver. Within forty-five (45) days of the receipt of the waiver request or all necessary documentation, whichever is later, the director shall provide the credit union a written response, either approving or disapproving its request. The director’s decision shall be based on safety and soundness considerations and a determination as to whether a conflict of interest exists.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2109, as added by 2020, ch. 230, § 4, p. 671.

§ 26-2110. Membership.

The membership of a credit union shall be limited to and consist of the subscribers to the articles of incorporation and such other persons having the common bond set forth in the articles of incorporation as have been duly admitted members, have paid the entrance fee, if any, as provided in the bylaws, have subscribed and paid for one or more shares, and have complied with such other requirements as the articles of incorporation or bylaws may specify.

Credit union organizations shall be limited to groups having a common bond of occupation or association, or to residents within a well-defined neighborhood, community, or rural district, employees of a common employer, or members of a bona fide fraternal, religious, cooperative, labor, rural, educational, or similar organization and members of the immediate family of such persons.

Societies and associations composed entirely of individuals who are within the field of membership of the credit union may be admitted to membership in the same manner and under the same conditions as individuals.

An individual who leaves the field of membership may be permitted to retain his membership in the credit union at the discretion of the board, and as provided in the bylaws.

An employer, including the state and its political subdivisions, may become a member of a credit union, of which its employee is a member, only for the purpose of placing shares or deposits in the credit union pursuant to an employee deferred compensation plan qualified under chapter 400 of the internal revenue code of 1954, as amended, or other retirement plans set out in section 26-2151, Idaho Code.

Credit unions may become members of other Idaho credit unions for the purposes provided in section 26-2120, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2110, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582; am. 1980, ch. 69, § 1, p. 144.

§ 26-2111. Expulsion and/or withdrawal from field or membership.

A member of a credit union may be expelled by the board but only after an opportunity has been given him to be heard for the purpose of such expulsion. A written notice of this hearing setting forth the time, place, and date for such meeting shall be forwarded to the member by the board together with the charges which serve as the basis for the expulsion. The member may be expelled for failure to meet the conditions of his membership, failure to carry out his obligations to the credit union, conviction of a felony, neglect or refusal to comply with the provisions of the laws under which this credit union operates and the bylaws of the credit union, and habitual neglect to pay obligations. Upon completion of the hearing, and if the board has voted to expel the member, the member shall remain liable for any sums owed to the credit union for loans or other purposes. The credit union may require twenty (20) days’ written notice to withdraw shares and/or deposits by the member, as funds become available.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2111, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2112. Fiscal year.

The fiscal year of all credit unions organized under this chapter shall end on the last day of December.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2112, as added by 1977, ch. 213, § 2, p. 582.

§ 26-2113. Member voting.

No member may have more than one (1) vote. A natural person may not hold more than one (1) membership in a credit union on behalf of himself or herself. An organization having membership in a credit union may cast one (1) vote through a natural person agent authorized in accordance with any requirements of the credit union.

Members may vote, as prescribed in the credit union’s bylaws, by mail ballot, absentee ballot, or other methods, which may include electronic methods. However, no member may vote by proxy.

A member who is not at least eighteen (18) years of age is not eligible to vote as a member unless otherwise provided in the credit union’s bylaws.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2113, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 2, p. 328.

§ 26-2113A. Annual membership meetings.

A credit union’s annual membership meeting shall be held in one of the communities where it maintains a branch to serve its members at such time as the bylaws prescribe, and shall be conducted according to the rules of procedure approved by the board.

Notice of the annual membership meetings of a credit union shall be given as provided in the bylaws of the credit union.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2113A, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 3, p. 328; am. 2019, ch. 188, § 1, p. 596.

§ 26-2113B. Special membership meetings.

A special membership meeting of a credit union may be called by:

A majority vote of the board;

A majority vote of the supervisory committee to suspend a director for cause; or

A written petition signed or similarly authenticated by at least ten percent (10%) or two thousand (2,000) of the members of a credit union, whichever is less.

Call of a special membership meeting of a credit union shall be in writing submitted to the secretary of the credit union by the board, the petitioners or the supervisory committee as applicable and, shall state specifically the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called and the agenda item or items for consideration by the members at the meeting. If the special membership meeting is called for the removal of one (1) or more directors or supervisory committee members, the call shall state the name of each individual whose removal is sought.

On receipt of a call for a special membership meeting, the secretary of the credit union shall determine whether the call satisfies the requirements of this section. If so, the secretary shall determine a reasonable date, time, and place at which the special membership meeting will be held and provide notice of the special membership meeting in accordance with the requirements of this subsection. The special membership meeting must be held at a reasonable location within the county in which the principal place of business of the credit union is located, unless provided otherwise in the bylaws. The special membership meeting must be held no later than sixty (60) days after the date on which the call is received by the secretary.
(3)(a) On receipt of a call for a special membership meeting, the secretary of the credit union shall determine whether the call satisfies the requirements of this section. If so, the secretary shall determine a reasonable date, time, and place at which the special membership meeting will be held and provide notice of the special membership meeting in accordance with the requirements of this subsection. The special membership meeting must be held at a reasonable location within the county in which the principal place of business of the credit union is located, unless provided otherwise in the bylaws. The special membership meeting must be held no later than sixty (60) days after the date on which the call is received by the secretary.

The secretary shall give notice of the special membership meeting at least thirty (30) days before the date of the meeting, or within such other reasonable time period as may be provided in the bylaws. The notice must state the purpose or purposes for which the special membership meeting is called and the agenda items for the meeting. If the special membership meeting is called for the removal of one (1) or more directors or supervisory committee members, the notice must state the name of each individual whose removal is sought.

Except as provided in this subsection, the chairperson of the board shall preside over special membership meetings. If the purpose of the special membership meeting includes the removal of the chairperson, the next highest-ranking board officer whose removal is not sought shall preside over the meeting. If the removal of all board officers is sought, the chairperson of the supervisory committee shall preside over the special membership meeting.

At the special membership meeting, only those agenda items that are stated in the notice for the meeting may be considered.

Special membership meetings shall be conducted according to the rules of procedure set forth in the bylaws. If the bylaws do not specify the rules of procedure that shall govern a special membership meeting, the special membership meeting shall be conducted according to the rules of procedure approved by the board.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2113B, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 4, p. 328.

§ 26-2114. Board of directors — Election of directors — Terms — Vacancies — Meetings — Rules.

The business and affairs of a credit union shall be managed by a board of no fewer than five (5) and no more than fifteen (15) directors.

The directors must be elected by and from the membership in conjunction with the credit union’s annual membership meeting. They shall hold their offices until their successors are elected or appointed.

Directors shall be elected to terms of between one (1) and three (3) years, as provided in the bylaws. If the terms are longer than one (1) year, the directors must be divided into classes, and an equal number of directors, as nearly as possible, must be elected each year.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, any vacancy on the board must be filled by an interim director appointed by the board, unless the interim director would serve a term of fewer than ninety (90) days. Interim directors appointed to fill vacancies created by expansion of the board will serve until the next annual meeting of members. Other interim directors will serve out the unexpired term of the former director, unless provided otherwise in the credit union’s bylaws.

In the case of a merger between two (2) credit unions pursuant to section 26-2132, Idaho Code, a board member of the merging credit union may continue to serve as a board member of the continuing credit union for a period not to exceed the equivalent of the duration of his or her unexpired term on the board of the merging credit union, provided that the approved plan of merger or other agreement approved by the director provides for such service on the continuing credit union’s board, with a corresponding expansion in the size of the continuing credit union’s board not to exceed the limits under subsection (1) of this section.

The board must have at least six (6) regular meetings each year, with at least one (1) of these meetings held in each calendar quarter. The board meetings must be held in the community of the credit union’s principal place of business within this state. The director may, upon written request of a credit union’s board of directors, authorize a credit union’s board meetings to be held at another location. Written requests from the credit union’s board of directors shall not include holding the credit union’s board meeting outside the state of Idaho unless a majority of the credit union’s membership resides in another state.
(6)(a) The board must have at least six (6) regular meetings each year, with at least one (1) of these meetings held in each calendar quarter. The board meetings must be held in the community of the credit union’s principal place of business within this state. The director may, upon written request of a credit union’s board of directors, authorize a credit union’s board meetings to be held at another location. Written requests from the credit union’s board of directors shall not include holding the credit union’s board meeting outside the state of Idaho unless a majority of the credit union’s membership resides in another state.

The director may require the board to meet more frequently than six (6) times per year if the director finds it necessary in order to address matters the director determines necessitate more frequent meetings including, without limitation, evidence of any of the following:

The credit union’s current composite capital adequacy, asset quality, management, earnings, liquidity, and sensitivity to market risk (CAMELS) rating issued by the director is a “3,” “4” or “5”;

The credit union’s current management component CAMELS rating issued by the director is a “3,” “4” or “5”;

The credit union’s net worth ratio is less than seven percent (7%);

The credit union is currently in a troubled condition;

In the judgment of the director, the credit union has committed an unsafe or unsound practice that has not been corrected to the satisfaction of the director and that continues to be a concern to the director, or the credit union is about to commit an unsafe or unsound practice; or
(vi) The credit union has been notified in writing by the director of a significant supervisory or financial concern.

If the director determines, as set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection, that a board of directors must meet more frequently than as set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director will send written notice to the board chair, with a copy to the credit union’s manager, setting forth the director’s findings underlying the determination and the required frequency of the board of directors meetings. This notice will remain in effect until rescinded in writing by the director.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2114, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 6, p. 328; am. 2019, ch. 188, § 2, p. 596.

§ 26-2114A. Board members — Qualifications.

A member of the board of directors must be a natural person and a member of the credit union. If a member of the board of directors ceases to be a member of the credit union, that person’s service as a member of the board of directors shall terminate effective on termination of membership in the credit union.

If a member of the board of directors is absent from more than one-fourth (¼) of the regular board meetings in any twelve (12) month period without being reasonably excused by the board, the member shall no longer serve on the board of directors.
(2)(a) If a member of the board of directors is absent from more than one-fourth (¼) of the regular board meetings in any twelve (12) month period without being reasonably excused by the board, the member shall no longer serve on the board of directors.

The board shall determine whether a member of the board is excluded from service pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection. After such determination has been made, the board secretary shall promptly notify the member of the board that such member shall no longer serve on the board. Failure to provide notice does not affect the termination of the member’s service under paragraph (a) of this subsection.

A member of the board of directors must meet any qualification requirements set forth in the credit union’s bylaws. If the board determines that a member fails to meet such requirements, the member shall no longer serve on the board.

The operating officers and employees of the credit union may not serve as members of the board of directors of the credit union.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2114A, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 7, p. 328.

§ 26-2114B. Officials — Fiduciary duty — Reliance on information.

Officials owe a fiduciary duty to the credit union and must discharge the duties of their respective positions:

In good faith;

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner the official reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the credit union.

In discharging the duties of an official, the official is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the credit union whom the official reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants or other persons as to matters the official reasonably believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the board of directors or supervisory committee of which the official is not a member if the official reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

An official is not acting in good faith if the official has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (2) of this section unwarranted.

An official is not liable for any action taken as a director, or any failure to take any action, if the director performed the duties of the director’s office in compliance with this section.

As used in this section, “official” means a member of the board of directors, board officer, supervisory committee member or senior operating officer of the credit union.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2114B, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 8, p. 328.

§ 26-2115. Officers.

Within ten (10) days following the organizational meeting and after each annual membership meeting, the board shall elect from among its members a chair of the board, one (1) or more than one (1) vice-chair and a secretary. The board shall also elect other board officers as provided for in the credit union’s bylaws for transacting the business of the board of the credit union. The terms of the board officers shall be one (1) year or until their successors are qualified and elected, unless sooner removed as provided in this chapter. All board officers must be elected members of the board.

The chair and secretary shall execute a certificate of election on a form approved by the department of finance, which certificate shall set forth the names and addresses of the officers, members of the board of directors and committee members elected or appointed. One (1) copy of the certificate of election shall be filed with the department of finance within ten (10) days after such election or appointment.

The board may designate as many operating officers as it deems necessary for conducting the business of the credit union including, but not limited to, a president or chief executive officer who shall be in charge of the credit union’s day-to-day operations.

A credit union may use any titles it chooses for the officials holding the positions described in this section as long as such titles are not misleading.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2115, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 10, p. 328.

§ 26-2116. Board of directors — Powers and duties.

The business and affairs of a credit union shall be managed by the board of directors of the credit union. The duties of the board include, but are not limited to, the duties enumerated in this section. The duties listed in subsection (2) of this section may not be delegated by the credit union’s board of directors. The duties listed in subsection (3) of this section may be delegated to a committee, officer or employee, with appropriate reporting to the board.

The board shall:

Retain the chief executive officer, or equivalent officer as specified in the bylaws, and set the chief executive officer’s compensation;

Set the minimum amount of funds in a share account, if any, required for membership;

Establish policies governing the operation of the credit union;

Establish the conditions under which a member may be expelled for cause;

Approve an annual operating budget for the credit union;

Designate those persons or positions authorized to execute or certify documents or records on behalf of the credit union;

Review the supervisory committee’s annual report; and

Authorize the conveyance of real property and buildings.

In addition, unless delegated, the board shall:

Determine the maximum amount of shares and deposits that a member may hold in the credit union;

Set the rate of interest on deposits, including nonmember deposits, and the rate of dividends on shares and authorize the payment of dividends on shares;

Approve the charge-off of credit union losses;

Determine the investment of surplus funds of the credit union in investments permitted by this chapter;

Fill vacancies on all committees; and

Authorize the credit union to borrow or lend money as needed to carry on the functions of the credit union.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-2116, as added by 2018, ch. 165, § 12, p. 328.